New York, session 2025-2026, S3372.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The tax law is amended by adding a new section 209-R to 2 read as follows: 3 § 209-R. Gift for uterine fibroids education. A taxpayer in any taxa- 4 ble year may elect to contribute to the support of the uterine fibroids 5 education fund. Such contribution shall be in any whole dollar amount 6 and shall not reduce the amount of the state tax owed by such taxpayer. 7 The commissioner shall include space on the corporate income tax return 8 to enable a taxpayer to make such contribution. Notwithstanding any 9 other provision of law, all revenues collected pursuant to this section 10 shall be credited to the uterine fibroids education fund and shall be 11 used only for those purposes enumerated in section ninety-seven-bbbbb of 12 the state finance law. 13 § 2. The tax law is amended by adding a new section 630-M to read as 14 follows: 15 § 630-M. Gift for uterine fibroids education. An individual in any 16 taxable year may elect to contribute to the uterine fibroids education 17 fund. Such contribution shall be in any whole dollar amount and shall 18 not reduce the amount of state tax owed by such individual. The commis- 19 sioner shall include space on the personal income tax return to enable a 20 taxpayer to make such contribution. Notwithstanding any other provision 21 of law all revenues collected pursuant to this section shall be credited 22 to the uterine fibroids education fund and used only for those purposes 23 enumerated in section ninety-seven-bbbbb of the state finance law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07480-01-5 S. 3372 2 1 § 3. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 97-bbbbb 2 to read as follows: 3 § 97-bbbbb. Uterine fibroids education fund. 1. There is hereby estab- 4 lished in the joint custody of the commissioner of taxation and finance 5 and the comptroller, a special fund to be known as the "uterine fibroids 6 education fund". 7 2. Such fund shall consist of all revenues received by the department 8 of taxation and finance, pursuant to the provisions of section two 9 hundred nine-R and section six hundred thirty-M of the tax law, and all 10 other moneys appropriated, credited or transferred thereto from any 11 other fund or source pursuant to law. Nothing contained in this section 12 shall prevent the state from receiving grants, gifts or bequests for the 13 purposes of the fund as defined in this section and depositing them into 14 the fund according to law. 15 3. Monies of the fund shall be expended only for uterine fibroids 16 education projects. As used in this section, "uterine fibroids education 17 projects" means educational projects, including grants for uterine 18 fibroids education programs for health care providers and public, which 19 are approved by the department of health. 20 4. Monies shall be payable from the fund on the audit and warrant of 21 the comptroller on vouchers approved and certified by the commissioner 22 of health. 23 5. To the extent practicable, the commissioner of health shall ensure 24 that all monies received during a fiscal year are expended prior to the 25 end of that fiscal year. 26 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.